Louisiana, session 2026, HB1016.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The sum of Twenty-Five Thousand and No/100 ($25,000.00) Dollars is
hereby payable out of the State General Fund (Direct) for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 for
payment of the consent judgment captioned "Deborah L. Reynolds versus Beauregard Parish
Police Jury, Amguard Insurance Company, and State of Louisiana, through the Department
of Transportation and Development", signed on February 5, 2026, between the state of
Louisiana, through the Department of Transportation and Development, and Deborah L.
Reynolds, bearing Number C-2021-0779, Division B, on the docket of the Thirty-Sixth
Judicial District, parish of Beauregard, state of Louisiana.
Section 2. The judgment may only be paid from this appropriation if it is final and
shall be paid as to principal, interest, court costs, and expert witness fees as awarded in the
judgment. If the provisions of the judgment conflict with the provisions of this Act, the
provisions of the judgment shall be controlling. Any other provision of this Act not in
Page 1 of 2

HLS 26RS-1416 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1016
conflict with the provisions of the judgment shall control. Payment shall be made only after
presentation to the state treasurer of documentation required by the state treasurer. Further,
the judgment shall be deemed to have been paid on the effective date of this Act, and interest
shall cease to run as of that date.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.